Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 6 School District Organization

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Equal Protection and the Financing of Public Education in Wyoming,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 15 to 50.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 18 to 73.